Massachusetts, session 194th, S1287.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 2 of chapter 175M of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
striking out the first paragraph of subsection (a) and inserting in place thereof the following 
paragraph:- (1) Family leave shall be available to any covered individual for any of the following 
reasons: (i) to bond with the covered individual's child during the first 12 months after the child's 
birth or the first 12 months after the placement of the child for adoption or foster care with the 
covered individual; (ii) because of any qualifying exigency arising out of the fact that a family 
member is on active duty or has been notified of an impending call or order to active duty in the 
Armed Forces; (iii) to care for a family member who is a covered servicemember; or (iv) to cope 
with the death of a family member by (A) attending the funeral or alternative to a funeral of the 
family member, (B) making arrangements necessitated by the death of the family member, or (C) 
grieving the death of the family member.   

of 4 12  SECTION 2. Said section 2 of said chapter 175M is hereby further amended by striking 
out the first paragraph of subsection (c) and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:- 
(1) A covered individual shall not be eligible for more than 12 weeks of family leave in a benefit 
year; provided, however, that a covered individual taking family leave in order to care for a 
covered servicemember pursuant to clause (iii) of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) shall not be 
eligible for more than 26 weeks of family leave in a benefit year. A covered individual shall not 
be eligible for medical leave for more than 20 weeks in a benefit year. A covered individual shall 
not take more than 26 weeks, in the aggregate, of family and medical leave under this chapter in 
the same benefit year. Nothing in this section shall prevent a covered individual from taking a 
medical leave during pregnancy or recovery from childbirth if supported by documentation by a 
health care provider that is immediately followed by family leave, in which case the 7-day 
waiting period for family leave shall not be required. A covered individual is entitled to a total of 
8 weeks of family leave under clause (iv) of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) upon the death of 
each family member of the individual within a benefit year, during 2 of which weeks the covered 
individual shall be entitled to a weekly benefit, except that leave taken as provided by clause (iv) 
of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) may not exceed the total period of family leave authorized by 
this paragraph and shall be counted toward the total period of family leave authorized by this 
paragraph.  
SECTION 3. The second paragraph of said subsection (c) of said section 2 of said chapter 
175M is hereby amended by striking out clause (A) and inserting in place thereof the following 
clause:- (A) Leave under clause (i) of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) shall not be taken by an 
employee intermittently or on a reduced leave schedule unless the employee and the employer of 
the employee agree otherwise. Leave under clause (iii) of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) or 

of 4 35 under paragraph (2) of said subsection (a) or under subsection (b), may be taken intermittently or 
on a reduced leave schedule by an employee when medically necessary. Leave under clause (ii) 
of said paragraph (1) of said subsection (a) may be taken intermittently or on a reduced leave 
schedule by an employee. Leave under clause (iv) of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) may be 
taken intermittently or on a reduced leave schedule by an employee.  
SECTION 4. Said second paragraph of said subsection (c) of said section 2 of said 
chapter 175M is hereby further amended by striking out clause (C) and inserting in place thereof 
the following clause:- (C) The taking of leave intermittently or on a reduced leave schedule 
pursuant to this paragraph shall not result in a reduction in the total amount of leave to which the 
covered individual is entitled under this chapter beyond the amount of leave actually taken. A 
covered employer may not require an eligible employee to take multiple periods of leave under 
clause (iv) of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) concurrently if more than one family member of the 
employee dies during a single benefit year.    
SECTION 5. Said section 2 of said chapter 175M is hereby further amended by inserting 
after the word “3,” in line 55, the following words:- , except a covered individual on family leave 
under clause (iv) of paragraph (1) of subsection (a), who shall receive such weekly benefit only 
for 2 of the 8 weeks to which the covered individual is entitled.  
SECTION 6. Section 5 of said chapter 175M is hereby amended by adding in subsection 
(a) the following paragraph:- (8) Certification for a covered individual taking family leave to 
deal with the death of a family member shall be sufficient if the covered individual provides (i) 
the name of the deceased, the date of death, the city of death and the employee’s relationship to 
the deceased; (ii) a copy of the deceased’s obituary or funeral program and the employee’s 

of 4 57 relationship to the deceased; (iii) a copy of the death certificate; or (iv) a document issued by the 
mental health care provider of the employee.